Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Chapter 21. Check Cashers.

§ 6.2-2100.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Check casher”
means a person engaged in the business of cashing checks, drafts, or money orders for compensation.

“Item”
means a check, draft, or money order.

“Registrant”
means a person registered under this chapter.

“Registration”
means a registration filed under this chapter.

History.

1995, c. 221, § 6.1-432; 2010, c. 794.

Research References.

Checks, Drafts and Notes (Matthew Bender). Weisblatt.

§ 6.2-2101.
Registration requirement; offices.

No person shall engage in business as a check casher in the Commonwealth unless such person has first registered with the Commission in accordance with procedures established by the Commission under this chapter.

Every registered check casher shall give written notice to the Commission, within 10 days thereafter, of the opening, closing, or relocation of an office.

History.

1995, c. 221, § 6.1-433; 1999, c. 529; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-2102.
Exempt persons.

This chapter shall not apply to:

Any person who:

Does not hold itself out to be a check cashing service;

Is principally engaged in the bona fide retail sale of goods or services;

Either as an incident to or independently of such a retail sale from time to time cashes items; and

Charges a fee or other consideration for the service that does not exceed the greater of $2 or two percent of the amount of the item; or

Any person authorized to engage in business as a bank, savings institution, or credit union under the laws of the United States or any state.

History.

1995, c. 221, § 6.1-434; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-2103.
Registration fees; reports.

Each registration form shall be accompanied by payment of a $200 fee, which shall not be refundable or abated in any event.

To defray the costs of their examination, supervision and regulation, check cashers required to be registered under this chapter shall pay to the Commission annually on or before July 1 a registration fee in an amount prescribed by the Commission, but not exceeding $250.

All fees shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the “Financial Institutions Special Fund — State Corporation Commission.”

Every check casher required to be registered under this chapter shall file such annual or other reports as the Commission may prescribe.

History.

1995, c. 221, § 6.1-435; 1999, c. 529; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-2104.
Investigations.

The Commission, upon receiving a complaint or upon its own motion, may investigate the affairs, business, premises and records of any person required to be registered under this chapter. In the course of such investigation, all persons associated with the person being investigated shall afford full access to all premises, books, records and information which the person making such investigation deems necessary. For the foregoing purposes, the person making such investigation shall have authority to administer oaths, examine under oath all the aforementioned persons, and compel the production of documents and objects of all kinds.

History.

1995, c. 221, § 6.1-436; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-2105.
Fees posted; endorsement of items cashed.

A registrant shall conspicuously post and at all times display, in every location at which it conducts the business of a check casher, a notice stating the fees charged for cashing items. A registrant shall further file with the Commissioner a statement of the fees currently charged at every such location.

Items cashed by registrants shall be deposited or presented for payment by the second business day from the date the item is cashed for the customer. A registrant shall endorse every item presented by the registrant for payment in the actual name under which the registrant is doing business.

A registrant shall post in every location at which it conducts the business of a check casher the Commission’s toll-free telephone number and information on how to file a complaint pursuant to regulations adopted by the Commission.

A registrant shall provide each customer cashing an item with a receipt showing the name or trade name of the registrant, the transaction date, the amount of the check, the fee charged, and the cash given.

History.

1995, c. 221, § 6.1-437; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-2106.
Regulations.

The Commission shall adopt such regulations as it deems appropriate to effect the purposes of this chapter. Before adopting any such regulations, the Commission shall give reasonable notice of the content thereof, and shall afford interested parties an opportunity to be heard, in accordance with the Commission’s Rules.

History.

1995, c. 221, § 6.1-438; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-2107.
Prohibited practices.

No person required to be registered under this chapter shall:

Engage in the business of making loans of credit, goods, or things; or discounting notes, bills of exchange, items, or other evidences of debt; or accepting deposits or bailments of money or items without meeting the requirements of the laws of the Commonwealth;

Cash post-dated items, other than government or payroll checks;

Use, or cause to be published or disseminated, any advertisement or communication that (i) contains any false, misleading, or deceptive statement or representation or (ii) identifies the person by any name other than the name or trade name set forth on the registration;

Engage in unfair, deceptive, or fraudulent practices; or

Make loans unless such person is licensed under, and the loans are made in accordance with, Chapter 18 (§

6.2-1800

et seq.).

History.

1995, c. 221, § 6.1-439; 2002, c. 897; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-2107.1.
Recordkeeping requirements.

As used in this section, a customer’s “identification document” means any of the following:

A state-issued driver’s license or identification card;

A U.S. government resident alien identification card;

A passport;

A U.S. military identification card;

A Non-U.S. government identification card;

A Mexican Matricula identification card; or

Other government identification card.

A registrant shall not cash an item for a customer in the course of conducting its business unless the registrant:

Makes a copy of both sides of the item or maintains a record of the following information that is available from the item:

ABA number;

Account number;

Check number;

Check type;

Date of check; and

Check amount; and

Makes a copy of an identification document that is presented by the customer to the registrant at the time the customer presents the item for cashing or maintains a record of the following information that is available from the identification:

Name;

Address;

Date of birth;

Type of identification;

Identification number; and

Identification expiration date.

A registrant shall maintain the information required by subsection B and a record of the time and date of the transaction. Such materials shall be maintained for a period of not less than six months following the date an item is cashed.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any registrant that is principally engaged in the bona fide retail sale of goods or services.

History.

2014, c. 768.

§ 6.2-2108.
Civil penalties; civil action.

The Commission may impose a civil penalty not exceeding $1,000 upon any person required to be registered hereunder who it determines, in proceedings commenced in accordance with the Commission’s Rules, has violated any of the provisions of this chapter or regulations adopted thereunder. However, the civil penalty that may be imposed upon any registrant who has violated a provision of §

6.2-2107.1

shall not exceed $100. For the purposes of this section, each separate violation shall be subject to the civil penalty therein prescribed.

Any person who suffers loss by reason of a violation of any provision of this chapter, other than a violation of a provision of §

6.2-2107.1

, may bring a civil action to enforce such provision. Any person who is successful in such action shall recover reasonable attorney fees, expert witness fees, and court costs incurred by bringing such action.

History.

1995, c. 221, § 6.1-440; 2010, c. 794; 2014, c. 768.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 768, in subsection A, added the second sentence; and in subsection B, inserted “other than a violation of a provision of §

6.2-2107.1

” and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 6.2-2109.
Criminal penalties.

Any person required to be registered under this chapter who acts as a check casher without first registering with the Commission as required by §

6.2-2101

is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. For the purposes of this section, each transaction entered into involving the cashing of an item by such person shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

1995, c. 221, § 6.1-441; 2010, c. 794.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 6.2-2110.
Revocation of registration.

The Commission may revoke a registration under this chapter upon any of the following grounds:

Any violation of the provisions of this chapter or regulations adopted thereunder or of any law or regulation applicable to the conduct of the registrant’s business;

Charging fees for cashing items in excess of fees posted at any place of business or filed with the Commission pursuant to §

6.2-2105

;

Conviction of a felony or misdemeanor involving fraud, misrepresentation, deceit, false swearing, or theft; or

Refusal to permit or respond to an investigation by the Commission.

For the purposes of this section, acts of any officer, director, member, partner, or principal shall be deemed acts of the registrant.

History.

1995, c. 221, § 6.1-442; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-2111.
Notice of proposed revocation.

The Commission may not revoke a registration under this chapter until it has given the registrant 21 days’ notice in writing of the grounds for the proposed revocation and an opportunity to be heard. The notice shall be served in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

. Within 14 days of mailing the notice, the registrant may file with the clerk of the Commission a written request for a hearing. If a written request for a hearing is filed, the Commission shall not revoke the registration except based upon findings made at such hearing.

History.

1995, c. 221, § 6.1-443; 2010, c. 794.